North Carolina statutes. Chapter 148. State Prison System.
Article 3. Labor of Prisoners.

§ 148-26.
State policy on employment of prisoners. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

It is declared to be the public policy of the State of North Carolina that all able-bodied prison inmates shall be required to perform diligently all work assignments provided for them. The failure of any inmate to perform such a work assignment may result in disciplinary action. Work assignments and employment shall be for the public benefit to reduce the cost of maintaining the inmate population while enabling inmates to acquire or retain skills and work habits needed to secure honest employment after their release.In exercising his power to enter into contracts to supply inmate labor as provided by this section, the Secretary of Public Safety shall not assign any inmate to work under any such contract who is eligible for work release as provided in this Article, study release as provided by

G.S. 148-4(4)

, or who is eligible for a program of vocational rehabilitation services through the State Vocational Rehabilitation Agency, unless suitable work release employment or educational opportunity cannot be found for the inmate, and the inmate is not eligible for a program of vocational rehabilitation services through the State Vocational Rehabilitation Agency, and shall not agree to supply inmate labor for any project or service unless it meets all of the following criteria:

The project or service involves a type of work by which inmates can develop a skill to better equip themselves to return to society;

The project or service is of benefit to the citizens of North Carolina or units of State or local government thereof, regardless of whether the project or service is performed on public or private property;

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 824, s. 2.

Wages shall be paid in an amount not exceeding one dollar ($1.00) per day per inmate by the local or State contracting agency.

As many minimum custody prisoners as are available and fit for road work, who cannot appropriately be placed on work release, study release, or other full-time programs, and as many medium custody prisoners as are available, fit for road work and can be adequately guarded during such work without reducing security levels at prison units, shall be employed in the maintenance and construction of public roads of the State. The number and location of prisoners to be kept available for work on the public roads shall be agreed upon by the governing authorities of the Department of Transportation and the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety far enough in advance of each budget to permit proper provisions to be made in the request for appropriations submitted by the Department of Transportation. Any dispute between the Departments will be resolved by the Governor. Prisoners so employed shall be compensated, at rates fixed by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety’s rules and regulations for work performed; provided, that no prisoner working on the public roads under the provisions of this section shall be paid more than one dollar ($1.00) per day from funds provided by the Department of Transportation to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety for this purpose. The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and the Department of Transportation shall develop a program to be implemented no later than July 1, 1982, to the extent money is herein appropriated, which shall include:

The use of portable toilets for inmate road crews.

As many of the male prisoners available and fit for forestry work shall be employed in the development and improvement of state-owned forests as can be used for this purpose by the agencies controlling these forests.

The remainder of the able-bodied inmates of the State prison system shall be employed so far as practicable in prison industries and agriculture, giving preference to the production of food supplies and other articles needed by state-supported institutions or activities.

The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety may make such contracts with departments, institutions, agencies, and political subdivisions of the State for the hire of prisoners to perform other appropriate work as will help to make the prisons as nearly self-supporting as is consistent with the purposes of their creation. The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety may contract with any person or any group of persons for the hire of prisoners for forestry work, soil erosion control, water conservation, hurricane damage prevention, or any similar work certified by the Secretary of Environmental Quality as beneficial in the conservation of the natural resources of this State. All contracts for the employment of prisoners shall provide that they shall be fed, clothed, quartered, guarded, and otherwise cared for by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety. Such work may include but is not limited to work with State or local government agencies in cleaning, construction, landscaping and maintenance of roads, parks, nature trails, bikeways, cemeteries, landfills or other government-owned or operated facilities.

(e1)

The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety may establish work assignments for inmates or allow inmates to volunteer in service projects that benefit units of State or local government or 501(c)(3) entities that serve the citizens of this State. The work assignments may include the use of inmate labor and the use of Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety resources in the production of finished goods. Any products made pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the provisions of Article 3A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes and may be donated to the government unit or 501(c)(3) organization at no cost.

Adult inmates of the State prison system shall be prohibited from working at or being on the premises of any schools or institutions operated or administered by the Youth Development Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety unless a complete sight and sound barrier is erected and maintained during the course of the labor performed by the adult inmates.

The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall establish rules, standards, and procedures for establishing inmate labor services contracts with any county or municipality expressing interest in contracting for inmate labor.

History.

1933, c. 172, ss. 1, 14; 1957, c. 349, s. 5; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1971, c. 193; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1975, c. 278; c. 506, ss. 1, 2; c. 682, s. 2; c. 716, s. 7; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; c. 802, s. 25.36; c. 824, ss. 1-3; 1981, c. 516; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1400; 1989, c. 727, s. 218(156); 1997-443, s. 11A.123; 1999-237, s. 18.21; 2001-95, s. 8; 2007-398, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i), (l); 2012-83, ss. 59, 61; 2015-241, s. 14.30(v); 2017-186, s. 2(rrrrrrr).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-26

.

§ 148-26.
State policy on employment of prisoners. [Effective January 1, 2023]

It is declared to be the public policy of the State of North Carolina that all able-bodied prison inmates shall be required to perform diligently all work assignments provided for them. The failure of any inmate to perform such a work assignment may result in disciplinary action. Work assignments and employment shall be for the public benefit to reduce the cost of maintaining the inmate population while enabling inmates to acquire or retain skills and work habits needed to secure honest employment after their release.In exercising his power to enter into contracts to supply inmate labor as provided by this section, the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction shall not assign any inmate to work under any such contract who is eligible for work release as provided in this Article, study release as provided by

G.S. 148-4(4)

, or who is eligible for a program of vocational rehabilitation services through the State Vocational Rehabilitation Agency, unless suitable work release employment or educational opportunity cannot be found for the inmate, and the inmate is not eligible for a program of vocational rehabilitation services through the State Vocational Rehabilitation Agency, and shall not agree to supply inmate labor for any project or service unless it meets all of the following criteria:

The project or service involves a type of work by which inmates can develop a skill to better equip themselves to return to society;

The project or service is of benefit to the citizens of North Carolina or units of State or local government thereof, regardless of whether the project or service is performed on public or private property;

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 824, s. 2.

Wages shall be paid in an amount not exceeding one dollar ($1.00) per day per inmate by the local or State contracting agency.

As many minimum custody prisoners as are available and fit for road work, who cannot appropriately be placed on work release, study release, or other full-time programs, and as many medium custody prisoners as are available, fit for road work and can be adequately guarded during such work without reducing security levels at prison units, shall be employed in the maintenance and construction of public roads of the State. The number and location of prisoners to be kept available for work on the public roads shall be agreed upon by the governing authorities of the Department of Transportation and the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction far enough in advance of each budget to permit proper provisions to be made in the request for appropriations submitted by the Department of Transportation. Any dispute between the Departments will be resolved by the Governor. Prisoners so employed shall be compensated, at rates fixed by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction’s rules and regulations for work performed; provided, that no prisoner working on the public roads under the provisions of this section shall be paid more than one dollar ($1.00) per day from funds provided by the Department of Transportation to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction for this purpose. The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction and the Department of Transportation shall develop a program to be implemented no later than July 1, 1982, to the extent money is herein appropriated, which shall include:

The use of portable toilets for inmate road crews.

As many of the male prisoners available and fit for forestry work shall be employed in the development and improvement of state-owned forests as can be used for this purpose by the agencies controlling these forests.

The remainder of the able-bodied inmates of the State prison system shall be employed so far as practicable in prison industries and agriculture, giving preference to the production of food supplies and other articles needed by state-supported institutions or activities.

The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction may make such contracts with departments, institutions, agencies, and political subdivisions of the State for the hire of prisoners to perform other appropriate work as will help to make the prisons as nearly self-supporting as is consistent with the purposes of their creation. The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction may contract with any person or any group of persons for the hire of prisoners for forestry work, soil erosion control, water conservation, hurricane damage prevention, or any similar work certified by the Secretary of Environmental Quality as beneficial in the conservation of the natural resources of this State. All contracts for the employment of prisoners shall provide that they shall be fed, clothed, quartered, guarded, and otherwise cared for by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction. Such work may include but is not limited to work with State or local government agencies in cleaning, construction, landscaping and maintenance of roads, parks, nature trails, bikeways, cemeteries, landfills or other government-owned or operated facilities.

(e1)

The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction may establish work assignments for inmates or allow inmates to volunteer in service projects that benefit units of State or local government or 501(c)(3) entities that serve the citizens of this State. The work assignments may include the use of inmate labor and the use of Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction resources in the production of finished goods. Any products made pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the provisions of Article 3A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes and may be donated to the government unit or 501(c)(3) organization at no cost.

Adult inmates of the State prison system shall be prohibited from working at or being on the premises of any schools or institutions operated or administered by the Youth Development Section of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction unless a complete sight and sound barrier is erected and maintained during the course of the labor performed by the adult inmates.

The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall establish rules, standards, and procedures for establishing inmate labor services contracts with any county or municipality expressing interest in contracting for inmate labor.

History.

1933, c. 172, ss. 1, 14; 1957, c. 349, s. 5; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1971, c. 193; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1975, c. 278; c. 506, ss. 1, 2; c. 682, s. 2; c. 716, s. 7; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; c. 802, s. 25.36; c. 824, ss. 1-3; 1981, c. 516; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1400; 1989, c. 727, s. 218(156); 1997-443, s. 11A.123; 1999-237, s. 18.21; 2001-95, s. 8; 2007-398, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i), (l); 2012-83, ss. 59, 61; 2015-241, s. 14.30(v); 2017-186, s. 2(rrrrrrr); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-26

.

§ 148-26.1.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply:

through (3) Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 709, s. 1.

(4)

through (7) Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 226.

(8)

“State public work project” or “State public work”: A useful service other than the construction of buildings performed on any land, or any structure thereon, belonging to any principal department of State government as defined in subdivision (6) above, including, but not limited to, State parks, campuses, playgrounds, highways, roads, lakes, forests and waterways.

(9)

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 226, s. 2.

History.

1975, c. 682, s. 3; 1983, c. 709, s. 1; 1985, c. 226, s. 2.

§§ 148-26.2 through 148-26.4.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 709, s. 1.

§ 148-26.5.
Pay and time allowances for work. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The provisions of

G.S. 148-18

and 148-13 shall be applicable to inmate work on local or State public work projects contracted for by the Secretary of Public Safety as provided by

G.S. 148-26

through 148-26.4. Travel, cost of inmate wages and custodial supervision expenses incurred by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and arising out of a local or State public work project shall be reimbursed on a cost basis to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety by the local or State contracting agency.

History.

1975, c. 682, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2017-186, s. 2(sssssss).

§ 148-26.5.
Pay and time allowances for work. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The provisions of

G.S. 148-18

and 148-13 shall be applicable to inmate work on local or State public work projects contracted for by the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction as provided by

G.S. 148-26

through 148-26.4. Travel, cost of inmate wages and custodial supervision expenses incurred by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction and arising out of a local or State public work project shall be reimbursed on a cost basis to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction by the local or State contracting agency.

History.

1975, c. 682, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2017-186, s. 2(sssssss); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p).

§ 148-27.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-398, s. 3, effective August 21, 2007.

§ 148-28.
Sentencing prisoners to Central Prison; youthful offenders. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

When a sentenced offender is to be taken to the Central Prison at Raleigh, a sheriff or other appropriate officer of the county shall cause such prisoner to be delivered with the proper commitment papers to the warden of the Central Prison. A person under 16 years of age convicted of a felony shall not be imprisoned in the Central Prison at Raleigh unless:

The person was convicted of a capital felony; or

He has previously been imprisoned in a county jail or under the authority of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety upon conviction of a felony.

This provision shall not limit the authority of the Secretary of Public Safety from transferring a person under 16 years of age to Central Prison when in the Secretary’s determination this person would not benefit from confinement in separate facilities for youthful offenders or when it has been determined that his presence would be detrimental to the implementation of programs designed for the benefit of other youthful offenders. Nor shall this provision limit the authority of the judges of the superior courts of this State or the Secretary of Public Safety from committing or transferring a person under 16 years of age to Central Prison for medical or psychiatric treatment.

History.

1933, c. 172, s. 7; 1971, c. 691; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1977, c. 711, s. 27; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1147, s. 32; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2017-186, s. 2(ttttttt).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-28

.

§ 148-28.
Sentencing prisoners to Central Prison; youthful offenders. [Effective January 1, 2023]

When a sentenced offender is to be taken to the Central Prison at Raleigh, a sheriff or other appropriate officer of the county shall cause such prisoner to be delivered with the proper commitment papers to the warden of the Central Prison. A person under 16 years of age convicted of a felony shall not be imprisoned in the Central Prison at Raleigh unless:

The person was convicted of a capital felony; or

He has previously been imprisoned in a county jail or under the authority of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction upon conviction of a felony.

This provision shall not limit the authority of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction from transferring a person under 16 years of age to Central Prison when in the Secretary’s determination this person would not benefit from confinement in separate facilities for youthful offenders or when it has been determined that his presence would be detrimental to the implementation of programs designed for the benefit of other youthful offenders. Nor shall this provision limit the authority of the judges of the superior courts of this State or the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction from committing or transferring a person under 16 years of age to Central Prison for medical or psychiatric treatment.

History.

1933, c. 172, s. 7; 1971, c. 691; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1977, c. 711, s. 27; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1147, s. 32; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2017-186, s. 2(ttttttt); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-28

.

§ 148-29.
Transportation of convicts to prison; reimbursement to counties; sheriff’s expense affidavit. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The sheriff having in charge any prisoner to be taken to the State prison system shall send the prisoner to the custody of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety after sentencing and the disposal of all pending charges against the prisoner, if no appeal has been taken. Beginning on the day after the Section of Prisons of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice has been notified by the sheriff that a prisoner is ready for transfer and the Division has informed the sheriff that bedspace is not available for that prisoner, and continuing through the day the prisoner is received by the Section of Prisons of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall pay the county:

A standard sum set by the General Assembly in its appropriations acts for the cost of providing food, clothing, personal items, supervision, and necessary ordinary medical services to the prisoner awaiting transfer to the State prison system; and

Extraordinary medical costs, as defined in G.S. 148-32.1(a), incurred by prisoners awaiting transfer to the State prison system.

If the Section of Prisons of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice determines that bedspace is not available for a prisoner after the sheriff has notified the Division that the prisoner is ready for transfer, reimbursement under this subsection shall be made beginning on the day after the sheriff gave the notification.

The sheriff having in charge any parolee or post-release supervisee to be taken to the State prison system shall send the prisoner to the custody of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety after preliminary hearing held under G.S. 15A-1368.6(b) or G.S. 15A-1376(b). Beginning on the day after the Section of Prisons of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice has been notified by the sheriff that a prisoner is ready for transfer and the Division has informed the sheriff that bedspace is not available for that prisoner, and continuing through the day the prisoner is received by the Section of Prisons of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall pay the county:

A standard sum set by the General Assembly in its appropriations acts for the cost of providing food, clothing, personal items, supervision, and necessary ordinary medical services to the parolee or post-release supervisee awaiting transfer to the State prison system; and

Extraordinary medical costs, as defined in G.S. 148-32.1(a), incurred by parolees or post-release supervisees awaiting transfer to the State prison system.

If the Section of Prisons of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice determines that bedspace is not available for a prisoner after the sheriff has notified the Division that the prisoner is ready for transfer, reimbursement under this subsection shall be made beginning on the day after the sheriff gave the notification.

The sheriff shall file with the board of commissioners of his county a copy of his affidavit as to necessary guard, together with a copy of his itemized account of expenses, both certified to by him as true copies of those on file in his office.

History.

1869-70, c. 180, s. 3; 1870-1, c. 124, s. 3; 1874-5, c. 107, s. 3; Code, ss. 3432, 3437, 3438; Rev., ss. 5398, 5399, 5400; C. S., ss. 7718, 7719, 7720; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1977, c. 711, s. 28; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1147, s. 32; 1993, c. 257, s. 18; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 20.2(a); 1997-443, s. 19(a); 1999-237, s. 18.10(b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (j); 2017-186, s. 2(uuuuuuu).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-29

.

§ 148-29.
Transportation of convicts to prison; reimbursement to counties; sheriff’s expense affidavit. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The sheriff having in charge any prisoner to be taken to the State prison system shall send the prisoner to the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction after sentencing and the disposal of all pending charges against the prisoner, if no appeal has been taken. Beginning on the day after the Division has been notified by the sheriff that a prisoner is ready for transfer and the Division has informed the sheriff that bedspace is not available for that prisoner, and continuing through the day the prisoner is received by the Division, the Division shall pay the county:

A standard sum set by the General Assembly in its appropriations acts for the cost of providing food, clothing, personal items, supervision, and necessary ordinary medical services to the prisoner awaiting transfer to the State prison system; and

Extraordinary medical costs, as defined in G.S. 148-32.1(a), incurred by prisoners awaiting transfer to the State prison system.

If the Division determines that bedspace is not available for a prisoner after the sheriff has notified the Division that the prisoner is ready for transfer, reimbursement under this subsection shall be made beginning on the day after the sheriff gave the notification.

The sheriff having in charge any parolee or post-release supervisee to be taken to the State prison system shall send the prisoner to the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction after preliminary hearing held under G.S. 15A-1368.6(b) or G.S. 15A-1376(b). Beginning on the day after the Division has been notified by the sheriff that a prisoner is ready for transfer and the Division has informed the sheriff that bedspace is not available for that prisoner, and continuing through the day the prisoner is received by the Division, the Division shall pay the county:

A standard sum set by the General Assembly in its appropriations acts for the cost of providing food, clothing, personal items, supervision, and necessary ordinary medical services to the parolee or post-release supervisee awaiting transfer to the State prison system; and

Extraordinary medical costs, as defined in G.S. 148-32.1(a), incurred by parolees or post-release supervisees awaiting transfer to the State prison system.

If the Division determines that bedspace is not available for a prisoner after the sheriff has notified the Division that the prisoner is ready for transfer, reimbursement under this subsection shall be made beginning on the day after the sheriff gave the notification.

The sheriff shall file with the board of commissioners of his county a copy of his affidavit as to necessary guard, together with a copy of his itemized account of expenses, both certified to by him as true copies of those on file in his office.

History.

1869-70, c. 180, s. 3; 1870-1, c. 124, s. 3; 1874-5, c. 107, s. 3; Code, ss. 3432, 3437, 3438; Rev., ss. 5398, 5399, 5400; C. S., ss. 7718, 7719, 7720; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1977, c. 711, s. 28; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1147, s. 32; 1993, c. 257, s. 18; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 20.2(a); 1997-443, s. 19(a); 1999-237, s. 18.10(b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (j); 2017-186, s. 2(uuuuuuu); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(ffff).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-29

.

§ 148-30.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 711, s. 33.

§ 148-31.
Maintenance of Central Prison; warden; powers and duties.

The Central Prison shall be maintained in such a manner as to conform to all the requirements of Article XI of the State Constitution, relating to a State’s prison. A suitable person shall be appointed warden of the Central Prison, and he shall succeed to and be vested with all the rights, duties, and powers heretofore vested by law in the superintendent of the State’s prison or the warden thereof with respect to capital punishment, or any matter of discipline of the inmates of the prison not otherwise provided for in this Article.

History.

1933, c. 172, s. 14.

§ 148-32.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 450, s. 2.